Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.335

Temporary worker housing operating license—Fee—Display—Suspension or revocation—Fines—Refunds—Rules—Application of department of labor and industries standards.

(1) Any person providing temporary worker housing consisting of five or more dwelling units, or any combination of dwelling units, dormitories, or spaces that house ten or more occupants, or any person providing temporary worker housing who makes the election to comply with the temporary worker building code under RCW 70.114A.081(1)(g), shall secure an annual operating license prior to occupancy and shall pay a fee according to RCW 43.70.340. The license shall be conspicuously displayed on-site.

(2) Licenses issued under this chapter may be suspended or revoked upon the failure or refusal of the person providing temporary worker housing to comply with rules adopted under this section or chapter 70.114A RCW by the department. All such proceedings shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) The department may assess a civil fine in accordance with RCW 43.70.095 for failure or refusal to obtain a license prior to occupancy of temporary worker housing. The department may refund all or part of the civil fine collected once the operator obtains a valid operating license.

(4) Civil fines under this section shall not exceed twice the cost of the license plus the cost of the initial on-site inspection for the first violation of this section, and shall not exceed ten times the cost of the license plus the cost of the initial on-site inspection for second and subsequent violations within any five-year period. The department may adopt rules as necessary to assure compliance with this section.

[ 1999 c 374 s 10; 1998 c 37 s 5.]